Tennessee statutes. Title 61 Partnerships
Part 11

Filing with Secretary of State

61-2-1101. Requirements generally.

The form and filing of a document must satisfy the requirements of this section, and of all other applicable sections or rules that add to these requirements, to be entitled to filing by the secretary of state.

Parts 1, 2, and 9 of this chapter must require or permit filing the documents with the secretary of state.

The document must contain the information required by parts 1, 2, and 9 of this chapter and any information required by rules promulgated by the secretary of state. The document may contain other information as well.

The document must be capable of being printed in ink in a clear and legible fashion on one (1) side of letter size paper.

The document must be in the English language. A limited partnership's name need not be in English if written in English letters, or Arabic or Roman numerals.

The person executing the document must sign it and state beneath or opposite the person's signature the person's name and the capacity in which the person signs.

The document must be delivered to the office of the secretary of state for filing and must be accompanied by the correct filing fee, and any corporate tax, license fee, interest, or penalty required by part 12 of this chapter.

The secretary of state may promulgate appropriate rules establishing acceptable methods for execution of any document to be filed with the secretary of state.

All documents submitted to the secretary of state for filing shall contain a statement that makes it clear that the documents are being filed pursuant to the chapter.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, § 78; 2011, ch. 99, § 29; 2020, ch. 719, § 28.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (a), inserted “The form and filing of”, and substituted “all other applicable sections or rules that add to these requirements” for “any other section that adds to or varies these requirements”; inserted a comma following “2” in (b) and in the first sentence of (c), following “letters” in (e), and following “interest” in (g); in (c), inserted “any information required by rules promulgated by the secretary of state.” at the end of the first sentence and substituted “The document may contain” for “It may contain” at the beginning of the second sentence; substituted “capable of being printed” for “typewritten or printed” in (d); substituted “limited partnership’s” for “limited partnership” in the second sentence of (e); in (f), substituted “must” for “shall”, twice substituted “the person's” for “his” and substituted “the person” for “he”; in (h), substituted “may” for “has the power to” and deleted “and regulations” following “rules”; and in (i), substituted “shall” for “should”, “that makes” for “which makes” and “the documents” for “they”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 719, § 35, June 22, 2020.

61-2-1102. Forms.

The secretary of state may prescribe, and shall furnish upon request, forms for documents required or permitted to be filed by all chapters of this title. If the secretary of state has prescribed a mandatory form for the document, then the document must be in or on the prescribed form or a conformed copy thereof.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 2020, ch. 719, § 29.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “prescribe, and shall furnish upon request, forms for documents” for “prescribe and shall furnish on request forms for all documents”, inserted “all chapters of”, substituted “title. If the secretary of state has prescribed a mandatory” for “chapter, but their use is not mandatory” and inserted “form for the document, then the document must be in or on the prescribed form or a conformed copy thereof.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 719, § 35, June 22, 2020.

61-2-1103. Filing, service, and copying fees.

The secretary of state shall collect the fees set forth in § 61-2-1207(a) when the documents described in that section are delivered to the secretary of state for filing.

The secretary of state shall collect a fee of ten dollars ($10.00), for each party at each address, each time process is served on the secretary of state under this chapter. The party to a proceeding causing service of process is entitled to recover this fee as costs if the party prevails in the proceeding.

The secretary of state shall collect a fee of ten dollars ($10.00) for copying all filed documents relating to a domestic or foreign limited partnership. All such copies will be certified or validated by the secretary of state.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, §§ 78, 79; 2011, ch. 99, § 22.

61-2-1104. Effective time and date — Delays — Registered agent and office.

Except as provided in subsection (b) and § 61-2-1105, a document accepted for filing is effective:

At the time of filing on the date it is filed by the secretary of state, as evidenced by the secretary of state's date and time endorsement on the original document; and

At the time specified in the document as its effective time on the date it is filed.

A document may specify a delayed effective time and date, and if it does so the document becomes effective at the time and date specified. If a delayed effective date but no time is specified, the document is effective at the close of business on that date. A delayed effective date for a document may not be later than the ninetieth day after the date it is filed by the secretary of state. Notwithstanding the foregoing, an application for a reserved name, a notice of transfer or cancellation of a reserved name and certificate of correction, may not specify a delayed effective date and time.

The secretary of state shall not file any certificate of limited partnership or an application for registration, unless the document designates the registered agent and registered office of such domestic or foreign limited partnership in accordance with parts 1 and 9 of this chapter. The secretary of state shall not file any other document under parts 1, 2 and 9 of this chapter if, at the time of filing, the domestic or foreign limited partnership does not have a registered agent or registered office designated at such time, unless at the time such document is received for filing the secretary of state also receives for filing a statement designating such registered agent or registered office or both.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, § 80.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 6-1102.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act (Glenn Stophel and James C. Heartfield), 26 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 22 (1990).

61-2-1105. Corrections — When effective.

A domestic or foreign limited partnership may correct a document filed by the secretary of state if the document:

Contains an incorrect statement; or

Was defectively executed, attested, sealed, verified or acknowledged.

A document is corrected:

By preparing a certificate of correction that:

Describes the document (including its filing date) or attaches a copy of it to the certificate;

Specifies the incorrect statement and the reason it is incorrect or the manner in which the execution was defective; and

Corrects the incorrect statement or defective execution; and

By delivering the certificate to the secretary of state for filing.

Certificates of correction are effective on the effective time and date of the document they correct except as to persons relying on those uncorrected documents and adversely affected by the correction. As to those persons, certificates of correction are effective when filed.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 6-1101.

61-2-1106. Filing procedure — Refusal — Effect.

If a document delivered to the office of the secretary of state for filing satisfies the requirements of § 61-2-1101, the secretary of state shall file it.

The secretary of state files a document by stamping or otherwise endorsing “Filed,” together with his name and official title and the date and time of receipt, on such document. After filing a document, the secretary of state shall deliver the document, with the filing fee receipt (or acknowledgement of receipt if no fee is required) attached, to the domestic or foreign limited partnership or its representative in due course. A domestic or foreign limited partnership or its representative may present to the secretary of state an exact or conformed copy of the document presented for filing, together with such document, and, in that event, the secretary of state shall stamp or otherwise endorse the exact or conformed copy filed, together with his name and official title and the date and time of receipt, and immediately return the exact or conformed copy to the party filing the original of such document.

If the secretary of state refuses to file a document, he shall return it to the domestic or foreign limited partnership or its representative within a reasonable time after the document was received for filing, together with a brief, written explanation of the reason for his refusal.

The secretary of state's duty to file documents under this section is ministerial. His filing or refusing to file a document does not:

Affect the validity or invalidity of the document in whole or in part;

Relate to the correctness or incorrectness of information contained in the document;

Create a presumption that the document is valid or invalid or that information contained in the document is correct or incorrect; or

Establish that a document purporting to be an exact or conformed copy pursuant to subsection (b) is an exact or conformed copy.

Any limited partnership document that meets the requirements of parts 1, 2, and 9 of this chapter for filing and recording, and all applicable rules, must be received, filed, and recorded by the appropriate office, notwithstanding any contrary requirements found in any other laws of this state.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 2020, ch. 719, § 30.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (e), substituted “that meets” for “which meets”, inserted a comma following “2” and following “filed”, and substituted “and recording, and all applicable rules, must be received,” for “and recording shall be received,”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 719, § 35, June 22, 2020.

61-2-1107. Appeal of refusal to file document.

If the secretary of state refuses to file a document delivered to his office for filing, the domestic or foreign limited partnership may appeal the refusal to the chancery court of Davidson County. The appeal is commenced by petitioning the court to compel filing the document and by attaching to the petition the document and the secretary of state's explanation of his refusal to file.

The court may summarily order the secretary of state to file the document or take other action the court considers appropriate.

The court's final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

Any judicial review of the secretary of state's refusal to file a document shall be conducted in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

61-2-1108. Copy as evidence.

A certificate attached or certification affixed to a copy of a document filed by the secretary of state, bearing his signature (which may be in facsimile) and the seal of this state, is conclusive evidence that the original document is on file with the secretary of state.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.